Rhode Island, session 2025, SB746.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-7-29 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7 entitled "Foundation
Level School Support [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7-29. Minimum salary schedule.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, every Every municipality and
regional school district shall establish and put into full effect by appropriate action of its school
committee in a municipality or regional school district where the school committee is elected, or
by appropriate action of the chief executive officer, in a municipality where the school committee
is appointed, a salary schedule recognizing years of service, experience, and training for all certified
personnel regularly employed in the public schools and having no more than twelve (12) annual
steps. The term “school year” as applied to the salary schedule means the ten (10) calendar months
beginning in September and ending the following June.
(b) In the Providence public school district only, the parties may negotiate alternative salary
schedules that do not include the provisions of section (a) of this section, and which may include
other bases for increased compensation including, but not limited to, bonuses for teachers willing
to take on greater responsibilities.
(b)(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a freeze or reduction of the monetary value of
the steps in the salary schedule through the collective bargaining process.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001468
========
LC001468 - Page 2 of 3